Hawaii, session 2026, SB2705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that food security and healthy diets are essential for positive youth development, thriving families, and resilient communities. Yet according to the Hawaii Foodbank, more than thirty per cent of households are food insecure, a level that is higher than during the pandemic. The legislature further finds that one of the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience's core missions is to help local families with food security, and the college intends to build a new human and community resilience institute that is community-based and data-driven.  The institute plans to unite the centers and programs with a shared purpose to increase children's food and nutritional security, positive youth development and health outcomes, family well-being, and community resilience.  The institute plans to include a center on the family, children's healthy living center, Hawaii nutrition center, expanded food and nutrition education program, and a statewide Hawaii 4-H youth development program.  The objectives of the institute are to: (1)  Conduct community needs assessments, policy analyses, and program evaluations to drive family and community resilience in collaboration with governmental agencies and nonprofit organizations; (2)  Develop and implement data-driven, family, and community-based approaches to enhance food and nutritional security, family well-being, and community resilience; (3)  Build 4-H youth development programs that foster food and farming entrepreneurship, healthy eating habits, and resilient food systems and community leadership; (4)  Build capacity for basic nutrition and healthy eating education in communities, K-12 schools, and colleges; and (5)  Develop a new community-engaged scholarship and learning program, a master community nutrition education volunteer program, and a new master's degree program in family and community resilience. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the college of tropical agriculture and human resilience for the development of its human and community resilience institute. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the development of a human and community resilience institute at the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience and for twelve staff positions, which shall include four community nutrition associates, four 4-H program coordinators, one analytical chemist, one nutrient data analyst, one data center manager, and one community-based program impact evaluator. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________